Florida, session 2026, SB608.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 14 15 Section 1.âSection 509.243, Florida Statutes, is created to 16 read: 17 509.243âVacation rentals; pool safety compliance; 18 penalties.â 19 (1)âAn applicant seeking to obtain, or a licensee seeking 20 to renew, a license to operate a vacation rental as described in 21 s. 509.242(1)(c) must install at least one pool safety feature 22 as described in s. 515.27(1) if a swimming pool is located on 23 the vacation rental property. 24 (2)âThe department may suspend or revoke the license and 25 fine the licensee for noncompliance with this section. 26 (3)âThe department may adopt rules to implement this 27 section. 28 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.